test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-07fueuesiga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - füüsiga: # Noun (7) füüsiga 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Nom: füüsiga
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Gen: füüsiga
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Par: füüsikat
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Ill: füüsikahe
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Ine: füüsikan
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Ela: füüsikast
     füüsiga+N+Sg+All: füüsikalõ
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Ade: füüsikal
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Abl: füüsikalt
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Tra: füüsikas
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Ter: füüsikaniq
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Abe: füüsikaldaq
     füüsiga+N+Sg+Com: [füüsikagaq, füüsigagaq]
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Nom: füüsigaq
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Gen: füüsikidõ
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Par: füüsikit
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Ill: füüsikihe
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Ine: füüsikin
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Ela: füüsikist
     füüsiga+N+Pl+All: füüsikilõ
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Ade: füüsikil
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Abl: füüsikilt
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Tra: füüsikis
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Ter: füüsikiniq
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Abe: füüsikildaq
     füüsiga+N+Pl+Com: füüsikidõgaq
